Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1016
Adjusted valuation; how established;
objections; filing; appeal; notice; correction due to clerical error; injunction
prohibited.

(1) On or before August 25, the county assessor
shall certify to the Property Tax Administrator the total taxable value by
school district in the county for the current assessment year on forms prescribed
by the Tax Commissioner. The county assessor may amend the filing for changes
made to the taxable valuation of the school district in the county if corrections
or errors on the original certification are discovered. Amendments shall be
certified to the Property Tax Administrator on or before September 30.

(2) On or before October 10, the Property Tax Administrator shall compute
and certify to the State Department of Education the adjusted valuation for
the current assessment year for each class of property in each school district
and each local system. The adjusted valuation of property for each school
district and each local system, for purposes of determining state aid pursuant
to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, shall reflect
as nearly as possible state aid value as defined in subsection (3) of this
section. The Property Tax Administrator shall notify each school district
and each local system of its adjusted valuation for the current assessment
year by class of property on or before October 10. Establishment of the adjusted
valuation shall be based on the taxable value certified by the county assessor
for each school district in the county adjusted by the determination of the
level of value for each school district from an analysis of the comprehensive
assessment ratio study or other studies developed by the Property Tax Administrator,
in compliance with professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques, as required
by section 77-1327. The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations setting forth standards for the determination of level of
value for state aid purposes.

(3) For purposes of this section, state aid value means:

(a) For real property other than agricultural and horticultural land,
ninety-six percent of actual value;

(b) For agricultural and horticultural land, seventy-two percent of
actual value as provided in sections 77-1359 to 77-1363. For agricultural
and horticultural land that receives special valuation pursuant to section
77-1344, seventy-two percent of special valuation as defined in section 77-1343;
and

(c) For personal property, the net book value as defined in section
77-120.

(4) On or before November 10, any local system may file with the Tax
Commissioner written objections to the adjusted valuations prepared by the
Property Tax Administrator, stating the reasons why such adjusted valuations
are not the valuations required by subsection (3) of this section. The Tax
Commissioner shall fix a time for a hearing. Either party shall be permitted
to introduce any evidence in reference thereto. On or before January 1, the
Tax Commissioner shall enter a written order modifying or declining to modify,
in whole or in part, the adjusted valuations and shall certify the order to
the State Department of Education. Modification by the Tax Commissioner shall
be based upon the evidence introduced at hearing and shall not be limited
to the modification requested in the written objections or at hearing. A copy
of the written order shall be mailed to the local system within seven days
after the date of the order. The written order of the Tax Commissioner may
be appealed within thirty days after the date of the order to the Tax Equalization
and Review Commission in accordance with section 77-5013.

(5) On or before November 10, any local system or county official may
file with the Tax Commissioner a written request for a nonappealable correction
of the adjusted valuation due to clerical error as defined in section 77-128
or, for agricultural and horticultural land, assessed value changes by reason
of land qualified or disqualified for special use valuation pursuant to sections
77-1343 to 77-1347.01. On or before the
following January 1, the Tax Commissioner shall approve or deny the request
and, if approved, certify the corrected adjusted valuations resulting from
such action to the State Department of Education.

(6) On or before May 31 of the year following the certification of adjusted
valuation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, any local system or
county official may file with the Tax Commissioner a written request for a
nonappealable correction of the adjusted valuation due to changes to the tax
list that change the assessed value of taxable property. Upon the filing of
the written request, the Tax Commissioner shall require the county assessor
to recertify the taxable valuation by school district in the county on forms
prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. The recertified valuation shall be the
valuation that was certified on the tax list, pursuant to section 77-1613,
increased or decreased by changes to the tax list that change the assessed
value of taxable property in the school district in the county in the prior
assessment year. On or before the following July 31, the Tax Commissioner
shall approve or deny the request and, if approved, certify the corrected
adjusted valuations resulting from such action to the State Department of
Education.

(7) No injunction shall be granted restraining the distribution of state
aid based upon the adjusted valuations pursuant to this section.

(8) A school district whose state aid is to be calculated pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section and whose state aid payment is postponed as
a result of failure to calculate state aid pursuant to such subsection may
apply to the state board for lump-sum payment of such postponed state aid.
Such application may be for any amount up to one hundred percent of the postponed
state aid. The state board may grant the entire amount applied for or any
portion of such amount. The state board shall notify the Director of Administrative
Services of the amount of funds to be paid in a lump sum and the reduced amount
of the monthly payments. The Director of Administrative Services shall, at
the time of the next state aid payment made pursuant to section 79-1022, draw
a warrant for the lump-sum amount from appropriated funds and forward such
warrant to the district.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 829, § 32;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 76;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 81;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 198;

Laws 1994, LB 1290, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 185;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3809;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 662;

Laws 1996, LB 934, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 24;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 103;

Laws 1997, LB 271, § 53;

Laws 1997, LB 342, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 595, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 713, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 46;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 24;

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 34;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 22;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 80;

Laws 2001, LB 170, § 28;

Laws 2002, LB 994, § 30;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 66;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 46;

Laws 2005, LB 263, § 16;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 46;

Laws 2006, LB 968, § 16;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 101;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 39;

Laws 2009, LB166, § 21.

Tax Equalization and Review Commission Act, see section 77-5001.

The plain language of this section (formerly section 79-3809) requires the Nebraska Department of Revenue to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to regulate the valuation process. Loup City Pub. Sch. v. Nebraska Dept. of Rev., 252 Neb. 387, 562 N.W.2d 551 (1997).